src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va urrir úrri/XxV1V2 urrir
SFX Va urtir úrtes/XxV7V8 urtir
SFX Va urtir úrte/XxV1V2 urtir
SFX Va urtir úrten/XxV1V2 urtir
SFX Va urtir urti/Ll urtir
SFX Va urtir úrti/XxV1V2 urtir
SFX Va urxir úrxes/XxV7V8 urxir
SFX Va urxir úrxe/XxV1V2 urxir
SFX Va urxir úrxen/XxV1V2 urxir
SFX Va urxir urxi/Ll urxir
SFX Va urxir úrxi/XxV1V2 urxir
SFX Va usir úses/XxV7V8 usir
SFX Va usir ús/XxV2 usir
SFX Va usir úsen/XxV1V2 usir
SFX Va usir usi/Ll usir
SFX Va usir úsi/XxV1V2 usir
SFX Va uspir úspes/XxV7V8 uspir
SFX Va uspir úspe/XxV1V2 uspir
SFX Va uspir úspen/XxV1V2 uspir
SFX Va uspir uspi/Ll uspir
SFX Va uspir úspi/XxV1V2 uspir
SFX Va ustir ústes/XxV7V8 ustir
SFX Va ustir úste/XxV1V2 ustir
SFX Va ustir ústen/XxV1V2 ustir
SFX Va ustir usti/Ll ustir
SFX Va ustir ústi/XxV1V2 ustir
SFX Va ustrir ústres/XxV7V8 ustrir
SFX Va ustrir ústre/XxV1V2 ustrir
SFX Va ustrir ústren/XxV1V2 ustrir
SFX Va ustrir ustri/Ll ustrir
SFX Va ustrir ústri/XxV1V2 ustrir
SFX Va utir útes/XxV7V8 utir
SFX Va utir úte/XxV1V2 utir
SFX Va utir úten/XxV1V2 utir
SFX Va utir uti/Ll utir
SFX Va utir úti/XxV1V2 utir
SFX Va utrir útres/XxV7V8 utrir
SFX Va utrir útre/XxV1V2 utrir
SFX Va utrir útren/XxV1V2 utrir
SFX Va utrir utri/Ll utrir
SFX Va utrir útri/XxV1V2 utrir
SFX Va uxir úxes/XxV7V8 uxir
SFX Va uxir úxe/XxV1V2 uxir
SFX Va uxir úx/XxV2 uxir
SFX Va uxir úxen/XxV1V2 uxir
SFX Va uxir uxi/Ll uxir
SFX Va uxir úxi/XxV1V2 uxir
SFX Va uyir úyes/XxV7V8 uyir
SFX Va uyir úye/XxV1V2 uyir
SFX Va uyir úyen/XxV1V2 uyir
SFX Va uyir uyi/Ll uyir
SFX Va uyir úyi/XxV1V2 uyir
SFX Va uñir úñes/XxV7V8 uñir
SFX Va uñir úñe/XxV1V2 uñir
SFX Va uñir úñen/XxV1V2 uñir
SFX Va uñir uñi/Ll uñir
SFX Va uñir úñi/XxV1V2 uñir
