src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abastecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ablancazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abogadar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aborregar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abrixelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aburbuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acabiyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acantonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acarrerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acaudexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acericar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achuquinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acobrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acollechar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aconceyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acordalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acorrompinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acoxicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acucurullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acuruxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adeldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adondiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afaitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aferruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afinxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afocinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afornellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afrisar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afuxir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agarabatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agañotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agradecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agurrionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agüerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
albergar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alcurrir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alfombrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allagunar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allechecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allixerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alloñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alodar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alverbializar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amalcochar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amarullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amaurecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amediar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amiñonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amorriyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amurallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
andurbiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anogar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aparcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apendonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiastar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apirllar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apolitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apotricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apuntalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrabucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrasguñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrecostar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arremellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arriandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arromanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asaltar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asoverar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atallecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atañer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atopinerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atragaldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atrupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
avaniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
avillanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añublinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bandoliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bastardiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bichar/VtSfYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bonificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bruñir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cacareñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calcular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
campar/VtSmYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
capitoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carpir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
catolizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
centuplicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chapiniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chincar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chuchuriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cinchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
climatizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
colocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
completar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
confechar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
contaminar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
conxugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cortiquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cruñir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
debrocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
delladiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
derrabicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaforar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desamalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desapareyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desarredolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desatranguzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descontentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desembridar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desencapotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenfocicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenrollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenxaguar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfaer/VtVaVkVr
desgravar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desmineralizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despidir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
destrabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dexunir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
disgustar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dramatizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embaecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embaucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embolsar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emburniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empantanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empatanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emperincotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empodrecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaleyonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encantrellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encerruscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encizañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encorrompinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encurtiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfadar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfollerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engalamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engarriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engorollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enguisar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enmoquetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enraxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enroxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ensuciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entiznar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entreabrir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entrugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
envexigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enxitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzorronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbanciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbatuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esboroñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escabechar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escagarrexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaltariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escapiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escañolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escobiyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esconciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escostrazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escurubuzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfargayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfocinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfrayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgarabeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esguañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esllanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmangallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmenuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmormiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esnidiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espantayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espasuriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
especializar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esperpellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espingorotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espolligar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espulir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
establecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estartayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estirayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estracaciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estremar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrucir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esvariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
etiquetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
faldiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
figurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fogonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fortalecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fritiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fuxir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
garabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gazmiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gritar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
guzmiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
humildar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
incinerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inseminar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inxirgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llagrimar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llardiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llevar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
lloramugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
macixar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
malvar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maquinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mastigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
medicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
midir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mondonguiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mugorecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
nalotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
neviscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
obrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
orixinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
palatalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
patalexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
penar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pertenecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pigaciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pizcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
polviar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
predominar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pringar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pruir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rabaniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rampiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rastrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reconcomer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reedificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
refraniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
relinchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
remeter/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reparar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
representar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resentir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVnVrVt
restrellucir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
retrayer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVr
revolvicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rincir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rondar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rustir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sancionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
segundar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sindicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
soceder/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sollozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sopletiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sotripar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
suplantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tafuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
teledirixir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
timar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tonsurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trabayucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
traumatizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tresfueyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trevesar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trunsir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
untar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
valumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vermutiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
voltiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xarriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xirgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xurgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zapoletiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zurrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
